lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Rounders: „Rounders“ kamuoliai; „Rounders“ bazės; „Rounders“ lazdos; „Rounders“ pirštinės ir kumštinės pirštinės; „Rounders“ apsauginė įranga; „Rounders“ rinkiniai; „Rounders“ treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Pálkovaná: Míčky na rounders; Mety na rounders; Pálky na pálkovanou; Rukavice pro pálkovanou; Ochranné pomůcky na rounders; Sady na rounders; Tréninkové pomůcky na pálkovanou
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 繞圈球: 跑圈子球; 跑圈子遊戲壘包; 繞圈球用球棒; 繞圈球用手套/手靶; 跑圈子遊戲護具; 跑圈子遊戲套裝; 繞圈球訓練輔助用具
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > ラウンダーズ: ラウンダーズボール; ラウンダーズ用ベース; ラウンダーズ用バット; ラウンダーズ用グローブ・ミット; ラウンダーズ用プロテクター; ラウンダーズセット; ラウンダーズ練習器具
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Rounders: Rounders Balls; Rounders Bases; Rounders Bats; Rounders Gloves & Mitts; Rounders Protective Gear; Rounders Sets; Rounders Training Aids
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Rounders: Rounders-pallot; Rounders-pesät; Rounders-mailat; Rounders-hanskat ja -käsineet; Rounders-suojavarusteet; Rounders-setit; Rounders-harjoitteluvälineet
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Rounders: Žoge za rounders; Baze za rounders; Kiji za rounders; Rokavice in palčniki za rounders; Zaščitna oprema za rounders; Kompleti za rounders; Pripomočki za vadbo za rounders
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Rounders: Loptičky na rounders; Méty na rounders; Pálky Rounders; Rukavice Rounders; Ochranné vybavenie na rounders; Súpravy na rounders; Tréningové pomôcky Rounders
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Ράουντερς (Rounders): Μπαλάκια ράουντερς; Βάσεις ράουντερς; Ρακέτες ράουντερς; Γάντια & γάντια χωρίς χωρίσματα ράουντερς; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός ράουντερς; Σετ ράουντερς; Βοηθήματα προπόνησης ράουντερς
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 圆场球用具: 绕圈球; 绕圈球垒包; 圆场球球棒; 圆场棒球手套/连指手套; 绕圈球护具; 绕圈球套装; 圆场棒球训练辅助用品
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Rounders: Rounders-Bälle; Rounders-Bases; Rounders-Schläger; Rounders-Handschuhe; Rounders-Schutzausrüstung; Rounders-Sets; Rounders-Trainingshilfen
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Rounders: Slagballen; Slagbalhonken; Rounders-knuppels; Rounders-handschoenen en -wanten; Beschermende kleding voor slagbal; Slagbalsets; Rounders-trainingshulpmiddelen
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Rounders: Mingi de rounders; Baze pentru rounders; Bâte pentru rounders; Mănuși și mitene de rounders; Echipamente de protecție pentru rounders; Seturi de rounders; Articole pentru antrenament rounders
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Rounder: Palline da rounder; Basi per rounder; Mazze per rounders; Guanti e manopole per rounder; Attrezzatura protettiva per rounder; Set da rounder; Ausili per allenamenti per rounder
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Rounders: Bolas de rounders; Bases de rounders; Tacos para rounders; Luvas e mitenes para rounders; Equipamento de proteção de rounders; Conjuntos de rounders; Auxiliares de treino para rounders
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Rounders: Brännbollar; Brännplattor; Roundersslagträn; Roundershandskar; Skyddsutrustning för brännboll; Brännbollsset; Träningshjälpmedel för rounders
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Palant: Piłki do rounders; Bazy do rounders; Kije do gry rounders; Rękawiczki i rękawice do gry rounders; Sprzęt ochronny do rounders; Zestawy do rounders; Pomoce treningowe do gry rounders
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Rounders: Rounders topları; Rounders kaleleri; Rounders Sopaları; Rounders Eldivenleri; Rounders koruyucu ekipmanları; Rounders setleri; Rounders Eğitim Araçları
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Английская лапта: Мячи для раундерса; Базы для раундерса; Биты для английской лапты; Перчатки для английской лапты; Защитная экипировка для раундерса; Наборы для раундерса; Тренировочный инвентарь для английской лапты
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Slåball: Baller for rounders; Baser for rounders; Slåballtrær; Slåballhansker; Beskyttelsesutstyr for rounders; Rounders-sett; Treningsutstyr for slåball
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Rounders: Bolas para rounders; Bases para rounders; Tacos de rounders; Luvas de rounders; Equipamentos de proteção para rounders; Kits de rounders; Auxílios de treinamento para rounders
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Rounders: Lopte za rounders; Baze za rounders; Palice za rounders; Rukavice za rounders; Zaštitna oprema za rounders; Kompleti za rounders; Pomagala za rounders trening
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Cờ bạc: Bóng Rounders; Gôn Rounders; Gậy chơi rounders; Găng tay chơi rounders; Đồ bảo hộ Rounders; Bộ đồ chơi Rounders; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập luyện rounders
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Rounders: Pelotas de rounders; Bases de rounders; Bates para rounders; Guantes y manoplas para rounders; Equipo de protección de rounders; Sets de rounders; Ayudas para el entrenamiento de rounders
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Раундърс: Топки за раундърс; Основи за раундърс; Бухалки за раундърс; Ръкавици за раундърс; Защитна екипировка за раундърс; Комплекти за раундърс; Помощни средства за тренировка по раундърс
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > ราวน์เดอร์: ลูกราวน์เดอร์ส; เบสราวน์เดอร์ส; ไม้ตีเราเดอร์; ถุงมือและนวมเล่นเราเดอร์; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันราวน์เดอร์ส; ชุดอุปกรณ์ราวน์เดอร์ส; อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมเราเดอร์
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 라운더스: 라운더스 공; 라운더스 베이스; 라운더스 방망이; 라운더스 장갑/글러브; 라운더스 보호 장비; 라운더스 세트; 라운더스 훈련 장비
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Rounders: Rounders labdák; Rounders bázisok; Rounders ütők; Rounders kesztyűk; Rounders védőfelszerelés; Rounders készletek; Rounders edzési segédeszközök
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Rounders: Balles de rounders; Bases de rounders; Battes de rounders; Gants et mitaines de rounders; Équipement de protection de rounders; Ensembles de rounders; Aides à l’entraînement au rounders
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Rundbold: Bolde til rundbold; Baser til rundbold; Rundboldbat; Rundboldhandsker; Beskyttelsesudstyr til rundbold; Sæt til rundbold; Træningshjælpemidler til rundbold